District of Columbia statutes.
7-1202.05

Power to grant authorization.

(a)

When a client is 18 years of age or over, the client or client representative shall have the power to authorize disclosures.

(b)

When a client is under the age of 18, but beyond the age of 14, disclosures which require authorization may only be authorized by the joint written authorization of the client and the client’s parent or legal guardian. When a client is less than 14 years of age, disclosures which require authorization may only be authorized by the client’s parent or legal guardian. However, if the client’s parent or legal guardian has not expressed consent to the mental health professional regarding the client’s receipt of professional services, the client may, by written authorization, consent without any authorization from his parent or legal guardian.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 205, 25 DCR 5055

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1202.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2015.
1973 Ed., § 6-1619.